Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.11
Broker or salesperson; application
for license; contents; expiration.

(1) Any person
desiring to act as a real estate broker or real estate salesperson shall file
an application for a license with the commission. The application shall be
in such form and detail as the commission prescribes, setting forth the following:

(a) The name and address of
the applicant and, when applicable, the name under which he or she intends
to conduct business; if the applicant will be conducting business through
a partnership, the name and residence address of each member thereof, the
name of the partnership's designated broker, and the name under which the
partnership business is to be conducted; if the applicant will be conducting
business through a limited liability company, the name and address of each
of its members, the name of the company's designated broker, and the name
under which the business will be conducted; if the applicant will be conducting
business through a corporation, the name and address of each of its principal
officers, the name of the corporation's designated broker, and the name under
which the business will be conducted; and if the applicant is an individual,
the applicant's social security number;

(b) The place or places, including
the city or village with the street and street number, if any, where the business
is to be conducted; and

(c) Such other information
as the commission requires.

(2) An application for
a broker's or salesperson's license shall expire one year after date of receipt
in the commission office.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 11;

Laws 1978, LB 361, § 4;

Laws 1983, LB 182, § 10;

Laws 1990, LB 350, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 532;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 219;

Laws 2002, LB 863, § 12;

Laws 2014, LB687, § 1.